en: salad mix
de: Mischsalat
fr: mélange de salades, salade mélangée
it: Insalata mista
sv: salladsmix

en: green and red salad mix
fr: salade mélangée verte et rouge

en: pointed cabbage mix
sv: spetskålsmix

fr: salade composée
en: mixed salad
de: gemischter Salat
es: ensalada mixta
hr: miješana salata
it: insalata composta

en: thistle
am: ኮሸሽላ
ar: شوك
cv: куршанак
cy: ysgallen
da: tidsel
de: Distel
eo: kardo
eu: kardu
fa: گل خار
fr: chardon
ga: feochadán
gd: cluaran
gv: onnane
hu: bogáncs
hy: տատասկափուշ
id: rumput duri
io: kardono
ja: アザミ
ko: 엉겅퀴류
kw: askallen
lb: Dëschtelen
mg: roy
nb: tistel
nl: distel
nn: tistel
oc: cardon
pl: oset
ru: репей
sn: rukato
sq: gjembaçi
sv: tistel, tistlar
tl: dawag
to: longolongoʻuha
wa: tcherdon
zh: 薊草, 薊花

en: capsicum annuum
xx: capsicum annuum, capsicum
sv: spanskpeppar, spansk peppar

en: bell pepper, sweet pepper
af: soetrissie
an: pimiento
ar: فلفل حلو
bg: чушка, чушки, пиперка, пиперки, капия
ca: pebrot morro de bou
da: peberfrugt
de: Gemüsepaprika
eo: kapsiko
es: pimiento, morrón, pimiento morrón, pimiento dulce, pimientos dulces
et: paprikad
eu: pipermorro
fa: فلفل دلمه‌ای
fi: paprikaa, makea paprika, makeat paprikat
fr: poivron, poivrons, mini-poivrons
ha: barkono
he: גמבה, פלפל
hr: paprika
hu: bell paprika
id: paprika
is: paprika
it: peperone, peperoni, peperoni dolci, peperone dolce
ja: ピーマン
jv: lombok loncèng
kk: бұрыш, паприка
kn: ದೊಣ್ಣೆ ಮೆಣಸಿನಕಾಯಿ
ko: 단고추
lt: saldžioji paprika
lv: paprika (groente)
mg: sakaibe
mk: бабура
mr: ढोबळी मिरची
ms: lada benggala
mt: bżar ħelu
my: ငရုပ်ပွ
ne: भेडे खुर्सानी
nl: paprika (vrucht), puntpaprika
oc: pebron
pl: papryka słodka
ps: خواږه مرچ
pt: pimentão, pimento
ro: ardei gras, ardei capia
ru: перец овощной, перец сладкий, перец сладкий свежий
sa: महामरीचिका
sk: paprika
sr: Бабура, paprika
ta: குடைமிளகாய்
te: కూరమిరప
th: พริกหยวก
tl: siling-pula
uk: овочевий перець
uz: shirin qalampir, paprika
vi: ớt chuông
wa: poevron
yi: פאפריקע
yo: ata tàtàṣé
zh: 菜椒

en: yellow bell pepper, yellow pepper, yellow capsicum
bg: жълта чушка, жълти чушки
ca: pebrot groc
cs: žlutá paprika
de: gelbe Paprika, Paprika gelb
es: pimiento amarillo, pimientos amarillos
fi: keltainen paprika
fr: poivron jaune, poivrons jaunes
hr: žuta paprika babura
it: peperone giallo
ja: 黄ピーマン
nl: gele paprika
pl: żółta papryka, papryka żółta, żółtej papryki
pt: pimentos amarelos, pimento amarelo
sl: rumene paprike
sv: gul paprika

en: grilled yellow bell pepper
fr: poivron jaune grillé

en: green bell pepper
bg: зелена чушка, зелени чушки
ca: pebrot verd, pebrots verds, pebrot verd dolç, pebrots verds dolços
cs: zelená paprika
da: Grøn peber
de: grüne Peperoni
es: pimiento verde, pimientos verdes, pimiento verde dulce, pimientos verdes dulces
fi: vihreä paprika
fr: poivron vert, poivrons verts, poivrons vert
hr: zelena paprika
it: peperoni verdi
nl: groene paprika
pl: zielona papryka, papryka zielona, zielonej papryki
pt: pimentos verdes
ru: перец сладкий зеленый
sk: zelená paprika
sv: Grön paprika

en: italian bell pepper
it: peperone italiano

en: red bell pepper, red pepper, red capsicum
ar: فلفل أحمر
bg: червена чушка, червени чушки, червена капия
ca: pebrot vermell, pebrot roig, pebrot vermell dolç, pebrots vermells dolços
cs: červená paprika
da: rød peberfrugt, rød peber
de: rote Paprika, roter Paprika, Paprika rot
el: κόκκινη πιπεριά
es: pimiento rojo, pimiento morrón rojo, pimiento rojo dulce, pimientos rojos dulces
et: punane paprika
fi: punainen paprika
fr: poivron rouge, poivrons rouge
he: פלפל אדום, גמבה אדומה
hr: crveni papar, crvena paprika
hu: kaliforniai paprika, piros bell paprika, piros kaliformiai paprika
it: peperoni rossi
ja: 赤ピーマン
lt: sarkanā paprika
lv: sarkanā paprika
nb: rød paprika
nl: rode paprika, rode paprika's
pl: papryka czerwona, czerwona papryka
pt: pimento vermelho
ro: ardei gras roșu
ru: Красный перец, перец красный, перец красный молотый, паприка красная
sr: crvena paprika
sv: röd paprika

en: red grilled pepper, red grilled capsicum
fr: poivron rouge grillée
hr: crvena pečena paprika
it: peperone rosso grigliato

en: italian pepper
de: italienischer Pfeffer
es: pimiento italiano
hr: talijanski papar
it: pepe italiano

en: piquillo pepper
bg: червени чушки Пикильо
ca: pebrot del piquillo, pebrots del piquillo
de: Paprika Piquillo, Piquillo Paprika
es: pimiento del piquillo
eu: pikillo piper
fr: poivron du piquillo, poivrons du piquillo
hr: piquillo papar
it: Peperone del Piquillo
ja: ピキーリョ
la: Capsicum annuum ‘Piquillo’
pt: pimiento del piquillo
sv: piquillo paprika

en: red and green bell peppers, green and red bell peppers
bg: червени и зелени чушки, зелени и червени чушки
de: rote und grüne Peperoni
es: Morrones rojos y verdes, pimiento rojo y verde
fi: punainen ja vihreä paprika, punaiset ja vihreät paprikat
fr: poivrons rouges et verts, poivrons verts et rouges
hr: zelena i crvena paprika
it: Peperoni dolci rossi e verdi
nl: rode en groene paprika's
sv: röd och grön paprika

en: red and yellow peppers, red and yellow bell peppers, yellow and red peppers, yellow and red bell peppers
bg: червени и жълти чушки, жълти и червени чушки
de: Peperoni rot und gelb
fr: poivrons rouges et jaunes, poivrons jaunes et rouges
hr: crvena i žuta paprika
it: peperoni rossi e gialli
nl: rode en gele paprika
sv: röd och gul paprika

en: chili pepper, chilli pepper, chilli, chillies, chile, chile pepper, chilies
ar: فلفل حار
be: чырвоны перац
bg: Люта чушка, люти пиперки, лютиви пиперки, чили, люти чушлета
br: pimant
bs: Čili
ca: bitxo
cs: chilli paprička
da: Chili, chilipeber
de: Peperoni, chilischoten, Pfefferoni, Chili
el: Τσίλι
eo: Kapsiketo
es: guindilla, ají, chile, pimenton picante, pimiento picante
et: tšilli, tšillipipar
eu: Pipermin
fa: فلفل تند
fi: chili, chilipippuri, chilipaprika
fr: piment, chili, piment du chili
gl: Chile
gn: Ky'ỹi
gu: મરચું
he: פלפלת צ'ילי
hi: मिर्च
hr: čili, Čili paprike
ht: Piman
hu: Csilipaprika
hy: Կարմիր պղպեղ
id: Cabai
is: Chilli pipar
it: peperoncino
ja: 唐辛子, チリ
jv: Lombok abang
ka: წიწაკა
kn: ಮೆಣಸಿನಕಾಯಿ
ko: 고추
ku: Îsot
ky: Калемпир
la: Chili
ln: Pilipilí
lo: ໝາກເຜັດ
lt: Raudonasis pipiras
lv: čili pipari
mk: лута пиперка
ms: Cili
my: ငရုတ်
nb: chilipepper, paprikaslekten
ne: खुर्सानी
nl: pepers, peperoni, chilipeper, chili, chilipepers, chilies
nn: chilipepar
nv: Azeedíchʼííʼ
oc: Piment
or: ଲଙ୍କା ମରୀଚ
os: Цывзы
pa: ਮਿਰਚ
pl: papryka chili, papryka chilli, chili, chilli, papryczka chili, papryczka chilli, papryczki chili, papryka chilli, papryka pepperoni, ostra papryka pepperoni
pt: chili
qu: Utsu
ro: chili, ardei iute
ru: перец чили
sa: मरीचिका
sd: ڳاڙھا مرچ
sh: Čili
si: මිරිස්
sk: Chilli paprička
sl: Čili
sn: Mhiripiri
so: Besbaas
sq: specë e djegëst
sr: Čili
su: Cabé
sv: chilipeppar, chili, fefferoni
ta: பச்சை மிளகாய்
te: మిరపకాయ
th: พริก
tl: Sili
tr: Acı biber
uk: червоний перець
ur: مرچ
vi: Ớt
wo: kaani
zh: 辣椒

en: tabasco chile
de: Chilenischer Tabasco
es: chiles tabasco
hr: tabasco čile
it: peperoncino Tabasco

en: chili puree, chilli puree
bg: пиперково пюре
de: Chilipaste, Chilipüree
fi: chilipyree, chilisose
fr: purée de piments
hr: pire od čilija
it: purea di peperoncino